District of Columbia statutes.
9-101.07

Beatty and Hawkins’s Addition to Georgetown.

All the powers given to the Mayor and Council of the District of Columbia and others under §§ 9-103.01 to 9-103.05 shall apply to and be capable of being exercised upon and through Beatty and Hawkins’s Addition to Georgetown, where it may be necessary to connect streets in parts of the District lying outside of cities, or to connect any street in the city with streets in the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 12, 1904, 33 Stat. 587, Joint Res. No. 21

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-116.
1973 Ed., § 7-116.

References in Text

“ Section 9-103.05” has been repealed by § 711 of D.C. Law 4-201, effective March 10, 1983.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(154, 156) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.